Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.343.330

Ballots—Form.

Except as provided in RCW 29A.52.210, the positions of school directors and the candidates therefor shall appear separately on the nonpartisan ballot in substantially the following form:

SCHOOL DIRECTOR ELECTION BALLOT

District No. . . . .

Date . . . . . .

To vote for a person make a cross (X) in the square at the right of the name of the person for whom you desire to vote.

School District Directors

Position No. 1

Vote for One

. . . .

□

. . . .

□

. . . .

□

Position No. 2

Vote for One

. . . .

□

. . . .

□

. . . .

□

To Fill Unexpired Term

Position No. 3

2 (or 4) year term

Vote for One

. . . .

□

. . . .

□

. . . .

□

The names of candidates shall appear upon the ballot in order of filing for each position. There shall be no rotation of names in the printing of such ballots.

[ 2015 c 53 s 12; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.316. Prior: 1963 c 223 s 2. Formerly RCW 28A.315.480, 28A.57.316, 28.58.083.]